Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB127.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1554 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is repealed:[Section 1554. Holocaust, Genocide and Human Rights Violations Instruction.--(a) (1) Beginning with school year 2015-2016, each school entity may offer instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to students. The instruction shall be integrated within the social studies and language arts courses of study required in accordance with State Board of Education regulations. Instruction may also be 123456789101112131415161718192021 integrated into other appropriate courses of study.(2) The Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations instruction permitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall:(i) Be age appropriate.(ii) Be sequential in method of study.(iii) Communicate the connection between national, ethnic, racial or religious intolerance and the subjects described in subsection (b).(iv) Communicate the impact of personal responsibility, civic engagement and societal response within the context of the subjects described in subsection (b).(3) School entities may utilize any appropriate public or private materials, personnel and other resources in developing and implementing the program of instruction permitted pursuant to paragraph (1). The Department of Education shall distribute information about appropriate curriculum materials to each school entity. School entities may utilize any curriculum that complies with the requirements of this subsection.(b) (1) The Department of Education shall establish curriculum guidelines no later than twelve (12) months after the effective date of this section. The guidelines shall encourage the inclusion of all of the following subjects where appropriate in the instruction:(i) The breadth of the history of the Holocaust, including the Third Reich dictatorship, concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, Jewish and non-Jewish resistance and post-World War II trials.(ii) The definition, history, response and actions taken in the face of genocide, including the Holocaust and any other genocide perpetrated against humanity, including the Rwandan 20250SB0127PN0076 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 genocide and other genocides committed in Africa, Asia and Europe.(iii) Human rights violations.(iv) Anti-Semitism, racism and the abridgment of civil rights.(2) The Department of Education shall work in consultation with organizations and individuals that provide educational expertise and resources related to the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to develop the curriculum guidelines. The guidelines shall state the minimum amount of instruction necessary to adequately educate students on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations.(c) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year, the Department of Education shall make available, to all school entities, in-service training programs based upon the instruction provided for under subsection (a) and the curriculum guidelines established pursuant to subsection (b).(d) (1) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year, each school entity providing instruction under subsection (a) shall provide, as part of its in-service training, programs on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations for all instructors whose teaching responsibilities include courses of study in which instruction concerning the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is integrated. A school entity may utilize the programs made available by the Department of Education or use other alternative programs that are consistent with the provisions of this section.(2) Employes required to complete continuing professional education under section 1205.2 shall receive credit toward the continuing professional education requirements where the 20250SB0127PN0076 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training program provided pursuant to paragraph (1) has been approved by the Department of Education.(e) The Department of Education shall provide the guidelines, in-service training and any other materials developed in accordance with this section to any nonpublic school within this Commonwealth upon receiving a request from the nonpublic school.(f) The State Board of Education shall:(1) Conduct a study regarding the manner in which instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is offered by school entities in this Commonwealth. In conducting the study, the State Board of Education shall request that each school entity provide the State Board of Education with information concerning whether the school entity offers such instruction and the manner in which such instruction is offered. Each school entity shall provide information to the State Board of Education in response to a request under this paragraph. Following the 2016-2017 school year, but not later than November 30, 2017, the State Board of Education shall issue a report to the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the Senate and the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives addressing the following:(i) The number of school entities offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations.(ii) The number of school entities using the curriculum guidelines established by the Department of Education under subsection (b).(iii) The number of school entities using the in-service 20250SB0127PN0076 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training programs made available by the Department of Education under subsection (c).(iv) A description of the manner in which school entities are offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations, including the number of hours of instruction offered, the grade levels at which such instruction is offered and the course within such instruction is integrated.(v) The recommendations for improvements to the offering of instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations, including recommended legislation.(2) Adopt a regulation, pursuant to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act," to require school entities to offer instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations that is consistent with subsections (a) and (b), if the study conducted by the State Board of Education under paragraph (1) demonstrates that less than ninety percent of the school entities are offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations consistent with subsections (a) and (b).(3) Adopt rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section pursuant to the "Regulatory Review Act."(g) For purposes of this section, the term "school entity" shall mean a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.]Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1554.1. Holocaust, Genocide and Human Rights Violations Instruction Required.--(a) (1) Beginning with school year 2026-2027, a school entity shall offer instruction 20250SB0127PN0076 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to students. The instruction shall be integrated within the social studies and language arts courses of study required in accordance with State Board of Education regulations. Instruction may also be integrated into other appropriate courses of study.(2) The Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations instruction under paragraph (1) shall:(i) Be age appropriate.(ii) Be sequential in method of study.(iii) Communicate the connection between national, ethnic, racial or religious intolerance and the subjects described in subsection (b).(iv) Communicate the impact of personal responsibility, civic engagement and societal response within the context of the subjects described in subsection (b).(3) A school entity may utilize appropriate public or private materials, personnel and other resources in developing and implementing the instruction under paragraph (1). The department shall make available information about appropriate curriculum materials to school entities. A school entity may utilize any curriculum that complies with the requirements of this subsection.(b) (1) The department shall review and update existing curriculum guidelines as necessary. The guidelines shall encourage the inclusion of the following subjects where appropriate in the instruction:(i) The breadth of the history of the Holocaust, including the Third Reich dictatorship, concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, Jewish and non-Jewish 20250SB0127PN0076 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resistance and post-World War II trials.(ii) The definition, history, response and actions taken in the face of genocide, including the Holocaust and any other genocide perpetrated against humanity, including the Rwandan genocide and other genocides committed in Africa, Asia and Europe.(iii) Human rights violations.(iv) Anti-Semitism, racism and the abridgment of civil rights.(2) The department shall work in consultation with organizations and individuals that provide educational expertise and resources related to the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to review and update existing curriculum guidelines as necessary. The guidelines shall state the minimum amount of instruction necessary to adequately educate students on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations. The guidelines shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the department shall make available to school entities in-service training programs based upon the instruction provided for under subsection (a) and the curriculum guidelines established under subsection (b).(d) (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity providing instruction under subsection (a) shall provide as part of its in-service training programs on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations for all instructors whose teaching responsibilities include courses of study in which instruction concerning the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is integrated. A school entity may utilize the 20250SB0127PN0076 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 programs made available by the department or use other alternative programs that are consistent with this section.(2) An employe required to complete continuing professional education under section 1205.2 shall receive credit toward the continuing professional education requirements where the training program provided under paragraph (1) has been approved by the department.(e) The department shall provide the guidelines, in-service training and any other materials developed in accordance with this section to a nonpublic school within this Commonwealth upon receiving a request from the nonpublic school.(f) (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter, a school entity shall post on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website an Internet link or title for resources used by the school entity for Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations instruction, a course syllabus or a written summary of the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations curriculum offered by the school entity.(2) The chief school administrator or a designee shall implement this subsection.(3) This subsection shall not be construed to require a school entity to violate the copyright, trademark or other intellectual property right of the creator or owner of the curriculum.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Anti-Semitism." A certain perception of Jews, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jews, in the form of rhetorical and physical manifestations directed toward Jewish or non-Jewish 20250SB0127PN0076 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individuals, their property, Jewish community institutions or religious facilities."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Genocide." The term includes any of the following acts committed with the intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnic, racial or religious group:(1) Killing members of the group.(2) Causing serious bodily or mental harm to members of the group.(3) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life calculated to bring about the group's physical destruction, in whole or in part.(4) Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the group.(5) Forcibly transferring children of the group to another group."Holocaust." The systematic, state-sponsored persecution and attempted annihilation of Jewish individuals and other groups by the Nazi regime in Germany between 1933 and 1945, which resulted in the murder of approximately six million (6,000,000) Jewish individuals and five million (5,000,000) other individuals."School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The repeal of section 1554 of the act shall take effect June 30, 2026.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0127PN0076 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930